src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/verb-klasse3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - fahkedh: # verb III, stem -a, root vowel -a-
    fahkedh+V+IV+Inf: fahkedh
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fahkam
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: fahkah
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fahkoe # (1.CASE: shouldn´t we accept the a-suffix also?  Prs+Sg3: 'fahkoe' and 'fahka'?)
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [fahkan, fahkoen] # fahkoen? 1.CASE: We accept two forms in 3.pl., but not in 1.dual?  2. CASE: if, we accept the second form, it should be 'fahkoen' with umlaut, when it it is 'oen-'suffix. but in this case the umlaut dosnt appear.
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [fahkeden, fahkajidien]
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: fahkajægan
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [fahkebe,fahkajibie]
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [fahkede,fahkajidie]
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [fahkoeh, fahkah] #1.CASE: We accept two forms in 3.pl., but not in 1.dual?  2. CASE: it should be 'fahkoeh' with umlaut, when it it is 'oeh-'suffix, but in this case the umlau dosn´t appear. 
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [fahkajim]
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [fahkajih]
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [fahkaji,fahkaj]
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [fahkajimen]
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [fahkajiden]
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [fahkajigan]
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [fahkajimh]
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [fahkajidh]
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [fahkajin]
    fahkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: fahkah
    fahkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: fahkeden     #  If Imprt+Du2 = Prs+Du2 , then Why dont we accept the longform? Because the grammar says so
    fahkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: fahkede # If Imprt+Pl2 = Prs+Pl2 , then Why dont we accept the longform?  
    fahkedh+V+IV+ConNeg: fahkah
    fahkedh+V+IV+Ger: fahkaminie
    fahkedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: fahkeme
    fahkedh+V+IV+VGen: fahkan

  Verb - guarkedh: # verb III, stem -a, root vowel -ua-  # MAJA: Means it is UMALUT in this group and it appears in ua - a- verbs. 
    guarkedh+V+TV+Inf: guarkedh
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: guarkam
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: guarkah
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: guarkoe # 1.CASE: it should be 'gåarkoen' with umlaut from ua-->åa, when it it is 'oe-'suffix. 2.CASE: shouldn´t we accept the a-suffix also?  Prs+Sg3: 'gåarkoe' nad 'guarka'? 
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [guarkan, guarkoen]  #1.CASE: We accept two forms in 3.pl., but not in 1.dual?  2. CASE: it should be 'gåarkoen' with umlaut, when it it is 'oen-'suffix.
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [guarkeden, guarkajidien]
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: guarkajægan
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [guarkebe, guarkajibie]
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [guarkede, guarkajidie]
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [guarkah, guarkoeh] #1.CASE: We accept two forms in 3.pl., but not in 1.dual?  2. CASE: it should be 'gåarkoeh' with umlaut, when it it is 'oeh-'suffix.
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: guarkajim
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: guarkajih
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [guarkaji, guarkaj]
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: guarkajimen
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: guarkajiden
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: guarkajigan
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: guarkajimh
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: guarkajidh
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: guarkajin
    guarkedh+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: guarkah
    guarkedh+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: guarkeden # If Imprt+Du2 = Prs+Du2 , then Why dont we accept the longform? Because the grammar says so
    guarkedh+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: guarkede #  If Imprt+Pl2 = Prs+PL2 , then Why dont we accept the longform? Because the grammar says so
    guarkedh+V+TV+ConNeg: guarkah
    guarkedh+V+TV+Ger: guarkaminie
    guarkedh+V+TV+PrfPrc: guarkeme
    guarkedh+V+TV+VGen: guarkan   
    
  Verb - tsånkedh: # verb III, stem -, root vowel -å-
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Inf: tsånkedh
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tsånkam
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tsånkah
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tsånkoe # (1.CASE: shouldn´t we accept the a-suffix also?  Prs+Sg3: 'tsånkoe' and 'tsånka'?)
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [tsånkan, tsånkoen] #1.CASE: We accept two forms in 3.pl., but not in 1.dual?  2. CASE: it should be 'tsånkoen' with umlaut, when it it is 'oen-'suffix.
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [tsånkeden, tsånkajidien]
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: tsånkajægan
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [tsånkebe, tsånkajibie]
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [tsånkede, tsånkajidie]
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [tsånkoeh, tsånkah]
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tsånkajim
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tsånkajih
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [tsånkaji, tsånkaj]
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: tsånkajimen
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: tsånkajiden
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: tsånkajigan
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tsånkajimh
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tsånkajidh
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tsånkajin
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: tsånkah
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: tsånkeden  # # If Imprt+Du2 = Prs+Du2 , then Why dont we accept the longform? Because the grammar says so
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: tsånkede   # # If Imprt+Pl2 = Prs+Pl2 , then Why dont we accept the longform? Because the grammar says so
    tsånkedh+V+IV+ConNeg: tsånkah
    tsånkedh+V+IV+Ger: tsånkaminie
    tsånkedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: tsånkeme
    tsånkedh+V+IV+VGen: tsånkan 

  Verb - vælnjedh: # verb III, stem -a, root vowel -æ-
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Inf: vælnjedh
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vælnjam
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vælnjah
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vælnjoe # (1.CASE: shouldn´t we accept the a-suffix also?  Prs+Sg3: 'vælnjoe' and 'vælnja'?)
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [vælnjan, vælnjoen]  #  vælnjoen? We accept two forms in 3.pl., but not in 1.dual?
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [vælnjeden, vælnjajidien]
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: vælnjajægan
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [vælnjebe, vælnjajibie]
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [vælnjede, vælnjajidie]
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [vælnjoeh, vælnjah]  #  We accept two forms in 3.pl., but not in 1.dual?
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vælnjajim
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vælnjajih
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [vælnjaji, vælnjaj]
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: vælnjajimen
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: vælnjajiden
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: vælnjajigan
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vælnjajimh
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vælnjajidh
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vælnjajin
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: vælnjah
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: vælnjeden # If Imprt+Du2 = Prs+Du2 ? Why dont we accept the longform? Because the grammar says so
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: vælnjede # If Imprt+Pl2 = Prs+Pl2 , then Why we dont accept the longform? Because the grammar says so
    vælnjedh+V+IV+ConNeg: vælnjah
    vælnjedh+V+IV+Ger: vælnjaminie
    vælnjedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: vælnjeme
    vælnjedh+V+IV+VGen: vælnjan 

  Verb - veajedh: # verb III, stem -a, root vowel -ea-
    veajedh+V+IV+Inf: veajedh
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: veajam
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: veajah
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veajoe
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [veajan, veajoen] # We accept two forms in 3.pl., but not in 1.dual? 
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [veajeden, veajajidien]
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: veajajægan
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [veajebe, veajajibie]
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [veajede, veajajidie]
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [veajoeh, veajah] # We accept two form in 3.pl., but not in 1.dual? I
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: veajajim 
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: veajajih
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [veajaji, veajaj]
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: veajajimen
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: veajajiden
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: veajajigan
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: veajajimh
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: veajajidh
    veajedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: veajajin
    veajedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: veajah
    veajedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: veajeden   # If Imprt+Du2 = Prs+Du2 ? Why dont we accept the longform? Because the grammar says so
    veajedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: veajede    # If Imprt+Pl2 = Prs+Pl2 , then Why dont we accept the longform? Because the grammar says so
    veajedh+V+IV+ConNeg: veajah
    veajedh+V+IV+Ger: veajaminie
    veajedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: veajeme
    veajedh+V+IV+VGen: veajan

  Verb - sjuahkedh: # verb III, stem -a, root vowel -ua-
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Inf: sjuahkedh
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sjuahkam
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sjuahkah
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sjuahkoe  #1.CASE: We accept two form in 3.pl., but not in 1.dual?  2. CASE: it should be 'sjåahkoe' with umlaut, when it it is 'oe' suffix. 
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [sjuahkan, sjuahkoen] # sjuahkan, but with 'oen' it should be 'sjåahkoen' umlaut!
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [sjuahkeden, sjuahkajidien]
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: sjuahkajægan
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [sjuahkebe, sjuahkajibie]
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [sjuahkede, sjuahkajidie]
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [sjuahkah, sjuahkoeh] # 1.CASE:  We accept two form in 3.pl., but not in 1.dual? 2.CASE: it should be 'sjåahkoeh' with umlaut when the suffix is 'oeh'. 
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sjuahkajim 
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sjuahkajih
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [sjuahkaji,sjuahkaj]
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: sjuahkajimen
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: sjuahkajiden
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: sjuahkajigan
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: sjuahkajimh
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: sjuahkajidh
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: sjuahkajin
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: sjuahkah
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: sjuahkeden # If Imprt+Du2 = Prs+Du2 ? Why dont we accept the longform? 
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: sjuahkede # If Imprt+Pl2 = Prs+Pl2 , then Why dont we accept the longform? 
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+ConNeg: sjuahkah
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+Ger: sjuahkaminie
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: sjuahkeme
    sjuahkedh+V+IV+VGen: sjuahkan

  Verb - raavhkedh: # verb III, stem -a, root vowel -aa-
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Inf: raavhkedh
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: raavhkam
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: raavhkah
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: raavhkoe
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [raavhkan, raavhkoen] #1.CASE: We accept two forms in 3.pl., but not in 1.dual? raavhkoen, raavhkan?
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [raavhkeden, raavhkajidien]
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: raavhkajægan
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [raavhkebe, raavhkajibie]
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [raavhkede, raavhkajidie]
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [raavhkoeh, raavhkah]
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: raavhkajim
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: raavhkajih
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [raavhkaji,raavhkaj]
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: raavhkajimen
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: raavhkajiden
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: raavhkajigan
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: raavhkajimh
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: raavhkajidh
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: raavhkajin
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: raavhkah
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: raavhkeden # If Imprt+Du2 = Prs+Du2 ? Why dont we accept the longform?
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: raavhkede   # If Imprt+Pl2 = Prs+Pl2 , then Why dont we accept the longform? 
    raavhkedh+V+IV+ConNeg: raavhkah
    raavhkedh+V+IV+Ger: raavhkaminie
    raavhkedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: raavhkeme
    raavhkedh+V+IV+VGen: raavhkan
